Illinois, session 104th, HB5091.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Permanent Punishments Review Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of the Permanent 7Punishments Review Task Force is to research and analyze 8models for periodic evaluation, modification, and, as 9appropriate, elimination of statutory permanent punishments 10that impact people with criminal records and make 11recommendations to the General Assembly regarding adoption of 12such models. The work of the Task Force is predicated on the 13reality that collateral consequences of a criminal record 14often result in continued, and sometimes permanent, punishment 15of Illinoisans after serving their sentences, that many 16statutory permanent punishments are not rooted in data or 17evidence, and that these permanent punishments hurt, rather 18than help, the people and communities they were designed to 19protect. 20    Section 10. Definition. As used in this Act:21    "Permanent punishment" means a penalty or disadvantage 22imposed because an individual has a criminal conviction or   HB5091 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17675 RLC 31106 b1other criminal history that is not part of the criminal 2sentence. "Permanent punishment" does not include 3imprisonment, probation, parole, supervised release, 4forfeiture, restitution, fine, assessment, or costs of 5prosecution. 6    Section 15. Creation; duties. The Permanent Punishments 7Review Task Force is created. The duties of the Task Force 8include: 9        (1) researching and analyzing the statutory permanent 10    punishments under Illinois law; 11        (2) identifying factors and data relevant to 12    determining whether a permanent punishment should be 13    modified or eliminated based on available scholarship; 14        (3) identifying or developing models, or both, for 15    periodic, systematic review of Illinois' permanent 16    punishments laws; and17        (4) analyzing such models, including potential funding 18    requirements, and proposing recommendations to the General 19    Assembly.  20    Section 20. Task Force composition. 21    (a) The Permanent Punishments Review Task Force shall be 22comprised of the following members, all of whom shall serve 23without compensation: 24        (1) the Executive Director of the Illinois Criminal   HB5091 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17675 RLC 31106 b1    Justice Information Authority, or the Executive Director's 2    designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member and 3    Chair; 4        (2) the Executive Director of a statewide coalition of 5    people with criminal records that advocates to address 6    permanent punishments, or the Executive Director's 7    designee, appointed by the Chair, who shall serve as Vice 8    Chair of the Task Force; 9        (3) the Director of Human Rights, or the Director's 10    designee; 11        (4) the Secretary of Financial and Professional 12    Regulation, or the Secretary's designee; 13        (5) the Director of Corrections, or the Director's 14    designee; 15        (6) the Director of the Office of Reentry for the City 16    of Chicago, or the Director's designee; 17        (7) a member of the Senate appointed by the President 18    of the Senate; 19        (8) a member of the Senate appointed by the Senate 20    Minority Leader; 21        (9) a member of the House of Representatives appointed 22    by the Speaker of the House; 23        (10) a member of the House of Representatives 24    appointed by the House Minority Leader; 25        (11) a representative of an organization that 26    advocates on behalf of incarcerated and formerly   HB5091 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17675 RLC 31106 b1    incarcerated women, who shall be appointed by the Chair 2    and Vice Chair; 3        (12) a representative of an association representing 4    Public Defenders, appointed by the Chair and Vice Chair; 5        (13) a representative of an association representing 6    State's Attorneys appointed by the Chair and Vice Chair; 7        (14) a representative of an organization that provides 8    re-entry services statewide, appointed by the Chair and 9    Vice Chair; 10        (15) a representative of an organization comprised of 11    people with a criminal record headquartered in a Southern 12    Illinois community with a population of less than 50,000 13    people, appointed by the Chair and Vice Chair; 14        (16) a representative of an organization that 15    advocates on behalf of crime victims, appointed by the 16    Chair and Vice Chair; 17        (17) a representative of an organization that provides 18    legal representation and policy advocacy on behalf of 19    victims of sexual assault, appointed by the Chair and Vice 20    Chair; 21        (18) a representative of an organization that 22    administers a hotline for victims of domestic violence, 23    appointed by the Chair and Vice Chair; 24        (19) a representative of an organization that aims to 25    reduce violence, decrease prison recidivism, and make the 26    criminal legal system more equitable, who shall be   HB5091 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17675 RLC 31106 b1    appointed by the Chair and Vice Chair; 2        (20) the Executive Director of the Illinois Sentencing 3    Policy Advisory Council, or the Executive Director's 4    designee; and5        (21) the Director of Juvenile Justice, or the 6    Director's designee.7    (b) The Vice Chair shall advise the Chair or the Chair's 8designee on appointments to the Task Force, convenings of the 9Task Force, and the substantive work of the Task Force. 10    Section 25. Illinois Criminal Justice Information 11Authority; administrative support. The Illinois Criminal 12Justice Information Authority shall provide administrative and 13other support to the Task Force. The Illinois Criminal Justice 14Information Authority may collaborate with the Vice Chairing 15organization to help provide this support. 16    Section 30. Meetings of Task Force; report to the General 17Assembly. The Task Force may meet in person or virtually, and 18shall issue a written report summarizing the research and 19findings of the Task Force and its recommendations to the 20General Assembly on or before September 1, 2028. 21    Section 35. Convening of the Task Force. The Task Force 22shall be appointed within 120 days of the effective date of 23this Act and the Chair shall convene the Task Force for its   HB5091 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 17675 RLC 31106 b1initial meeting 150 days after the effective date of this Act. 2    Section 40. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 32029. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.